Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1852.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 212(b), (c.1), (c.2)(1) and (3) and (c.3) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 212. Tourism Promotion Fund.--* * *(b) The [tax collected by a booking agent on accommodation fees under section 210] following taxes shall be deposited into the fund and disbursed [upon appropriation] for the [purpose of 123456789101112131415161718192021 promoting tourism in this Commonwealth.] purposes specified under subsection (b.1):(1) The tax collected by a booking agent on accommodation fees under section 210.(2) The tax collected and remitted by a booking agent under section 210 on behalf of an operator who is not required to have a sales, use and hotel occupancy license.(b.1) Beginning in the 2025-2026 fiscal year and continuing each fiscal year thereafter, money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department and shall be allocated annually by the department as follows:(1) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to the department for the purpose of promoting tourism in this Commonwealth.(2) The remaining money in the fund shall be allocated by the department as follows:(i) Sixty-five percent to the department for the purpose of promoting tourism in this Commonwealth.(ii) Ten percent to the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission for the purpose of museum assistance grants.(iii) Twenty-five percent to the Pennsylvania Council on the Arts for the purpose of grants to the arts.* * *(c.1) Money from the fund may not be used by the department under subsection (b.1)(1) and (2)(i) for the promotion or marketing operations of a tourism entity or for special events or grants until thirty days after the publication of the guidelines, rules and regulations under subsection (c) in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(c.2) The following shall apply:(1) No more than fifty per cent of the funds available to 20250HB1852PN2287 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the department for disbursement under subsection [(b)] (b.1)(1) and (2)(i) may be distributed for the purposes of promotion or marketing operations of a tourism entity or for special events or grants.* * *(3) A single recipient of funding under paragraph (2) may not be awarded more than fifteen per cent of the total funds available for disbursement to the department under subsection [(b)] (b.1)(1) and (2)(i). This paragraph shall not apply to contracts entered into by the department for Statewide tourism promotion or marketing.(c.3) Funds available to the department for disbursement under subsection [(b)] (b.1)(1) and (2)(i) may not be used for capital projects or for the design, construction, rehabilitation, repair, installation or purchase of any building, structure or sign in this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB1852PN2287 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819